Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB838.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary for health and family services or his or her
authorized representative;
(3) "Public assistance" means money grants, assistance in kind, or services to or for the
benefit of needy aged, needy blind, needy permanently and totally disabled persons,
needy children, or persons with whom a needy child lives or a family containing a
combination of these categories, except that the term shall not be construed to
permit the granting of financial aid where the purpose of such aid is to obtain an
abortion. For purposes of this section and KRS 205.560, "abortion" means an act,
procedure, device, or prescription administered or prescribed for a pregnant woman
by any person, including the pregnant woman herself, producing premature
expulsion of the fetus. Abortion does not include an induced premature birth
intended to produce a live viable child;
(4) "Needy child" means a child who has been deprived of parental support by reasons
prescribed by regulations within the scope of Title IV of the Social Security Act, its
amendments, and federal regulations and who does not have otherwise provided for
him or her a subsistence compatible with decency and health;
(5) "Parent," in addition to biological or adoptive parent, shall include stepparent;
(6) "Needy aged" means a person who has attained the age of sixty-five (65) and who
is unable to provide for himself or herself and who does not have otherwise
provided for him or her a subsistence compatible with decency and health;
(7) "Needy blind" means a person who has no vision or whose vision is so defective as
to prevent the performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/27/2026 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1578
who is unable to provide for himself or herself and who does not have otherwise
provided for him or her a subsistence compatible with decency and health;
(8) "Person with whom a needy child lives" means the individual prescribed by
regulation, with whom such child is living in a place of residence maintained by
such individual by himself or herself or together with one (1) or more other
persons;
(9) "Needy permanently and totally disabled" means a person eighteen (18) years of
age or older and who has a permanent physical or mental impairment, disease, or
loss that substantially precludes him or her from engaging in useful occupations
within his or her competence and who is unable to provide for himself or herself
and who does not have otherwise provided for him or her a subsistence compatible
with decency and health;
(10) "Private institution" means any establishment or place other than a public institution
operated or maintained by any individual, association, corporation, or other
organization which provides a group living arrangement for four (4) or more
individuals, who are cared for and maintained in residence for compensation or
otherwise;
(11) "Public institution" means any establishment or place which is the responsibility of
and administered by the state or any political subdivision thereof providing a group
living arrangement in which one (1) or more individuals are cared for and
maintained in residence;
(12) "Public medical institution" means any public institution the primary purpose of
which is to furnish hospital care and medical treatment;
(13) "Person determined to be potentially responsible" means any person who:
(a) Is not aged, blind, disabled, incapacitated, or needed in the home:
1. Because of the illness or incapacity of a member of the family; or
2. Because of children in the home under the age of six (6); or
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/27/2026 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1578
(b) Volunteers for such determination;
(14) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to deprive a woman of all appropriate
medical care necessary to prevent her physical death;
(15) "Adult day-care center" means any adult care facility which provides part-time care,
day or night, but less than twenty-four (24) hours, to at least four (4) adults not
related to the operator of the adult care facility by blood, marriage, or adoption.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/27/2026 2:48 PM Jacketed